Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-412
General acute hospital, defined.

General acute hospital means a hospital with a duly constituted governing body where medical, nursing, surgical, anesthesia, laboratory, diagnostic radiology, pharmacy, and dietary services are provided on an inpatient or outpatient basis by the organized medical staff of such hospital.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 12.